Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska37-564
Interference with person hunting, trapping, or fishing.

(1) No person shall knowingly and intentionally interfere or attempt to interfere with another person who is not trespassing and who is lawfully hunting or trapping any game bird, game animal, fur-bearing animal, or other wild mammal or bird or engaged in activity associated with hunting or trapping.

(2) No person shall knowingly and intentionally interfere or attempt to interfere with another person who is not trespassing and who is lawfully fishing or engaged in activity associated with fishing.

(3) For purposes of this section, (a) activity associated with hunting, trapping, or fishing shall mean travel, camping, or other acts that are preparatory to or in conjunction with hunting, trapping, or fishing on lands or waters upon which hunting, trapping, or fishing may lawfully occur and that are done by a hunter, a trapper, or an angler or by a member of a hunting, trapping, or fishing party and (b) interfere shall mean (i) disturbing, scaring, chasing, or otherwise driving away by any means any game bird, game animal, fur-bearing animal, other wild mammal or bird, or game fish, but shall not include releasing a non-fur-bearing animal, except a coyote, from a trap, (ii) impeding or obstructing a person who is hunting, trapping, or fishing, (iii) impeding or obstructing a person who is engaged in an activity associated with hunting, trapping, or fishing, (iv) affecting the condition or location of personal property intended for use in hunting, trapping, or fishing, and (v) intentionally placing himself or herself into the line of fire for the purpose of interfering with lawful hunting or trapping.

Laws 1995, LB 274, § 2;

R.S.Supp.,1996, § 37-529.01;

Laws 1998, LB 922, § 284.